Utah statutes.
53B-2a-104.   Utah College of Applied Technology Board of Trustees -- Powers and duties.

(1)  The Utah College of Applied Technology Board of Trustees is vested with the control, management, and supervision of the Utah College of Applied Technology college campuses in a manner consistent with the policy and purpose of this title and the specific powers and responsibilities granted to it.

(2)  The Utah College of Applied Technology Board of Trustees shall:

(a)  ensure that the Utah College of Applied Technology college campuses comply with the requirements in Section 53B-2a-106;

(b)  appoint the president for the Utah College of Applied Technology in accordance with Section 53B-2a-102; 

(c)  advise the president of the Utah College of Applied Technology and the State Board of Regents on issues related to career and technical education, including articulation with institutions of higher education and public education;

(d)  receive budget requests from each college campus, compile and prioritize the requests, and submit the request to:

(i)  the Legislature; and

(ii)  the Governor's Office of Planning and Budget;

(e)  receive funding requests pertaining to capital facilities and land purchases from each college campus, ensure that the requests comply with Section 53B-2a-112, prioritize the requests, and submit the prioritized requests to the State Building Board;

(f)  in conjunction with the Utah College of Applied Technology president, establish benchmarks, provide oversight, evaluate program performance, and obtain independent audits to ensure that campuses follow the non-credit career and technical education mission described in this part;

(g)  approve programs for the Utah College of Applied Technology;

(h)  approve the tuition rates for the Utah College of Applied Technology;

(i)  prepare and submit an annual report detailing its progress and recommendations on career and technical education issues to the governor and to the Legislature's Education Interim Committee by October 31 of each year, which shall include information detailing:

(i)  how the career and technical education needs of secondary students are being met, including what access secondary students have to programs offered at college campuses;

(ii)  how the emphasis on high demand, high wage, and high skill jobs in business and industry described in Subsection 53B-2a-106(1)(c)(ii) is being provided;

(iii)  performance outcomes, including:

(A)  entered employment;

(B)  job retention; and

(C)  earnings; and

(iv)  student tuition and fees; and

(j)  collaborate with the State Board of Regents, the State Board of Education, the State System of Public Education, the State System of Higher Education, the Department of Workforce Services, and the Governor's Office of Economic Development on the delivery of career and technical education.

(3)  The Utah College of Applied Technology Board of Trustees, the president of the Utah College of Applied Technology, and the Utah College of Applied Technology's college campuses, presidents, and boards of directors may not conduct a feasibility study or perform another act relating to offering a degree or awarding credit.

